Alabama, session 2026rs, SB360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
28 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
Page 1

Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
SB360 Engrossed
29 the Power to the People Act.
30 Section 2. Sections 37-1-1, 37-1-3, 37-1-5, and
31 37-1-12, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
32 "§37-1-1
33 A commission to be known as the Public Service
34 Commission, consisting of a president and two associates who
35 shall be competent persons and qualified electors of this
36 state, is established with seven commissioners as provided
37 under Section 37-1-3."
38 "§37-1-3
39 (a)(1) The terms of office of the commissioners shall
40 be for four years; at the election to be held in the state on
41 the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, for all
42 commissioners serving on or before the effective date of this
43 act.
44 (2) At the general election held in November 1940, and
45 every four years thereafter until the general election held in
46 November 2028, a president of the commission shall be elected
47 by the qualified electors of this state; and at the general
48 election to be held in the state on the first Tuesday after
49 the first Monday held in November, 1942, and every four years
50 thereafter until the general election held in November 2026,
51 two associates, who, with the president, shall constitute the
52 commission, shall be elected by the qualified electors of the
53 state. The result of such election shall be ascertained and
54 declared by the same authority and in the same manner as are
55 the results of election for Chief Justice and associate
56 justices of the Supreme Court.
Page 2

justices of the Supreme Court.
SB360 Engrossed
57 (b) The persons elected to fill the offices shall enter
58 upon the discharge of their respective duties on the day after
59 the general election at which they are elected and expire on
60 the day after the general election held in the fourth year
61 after their election.
62 (b)(1) Beginning after the effective date of this act,
63 the membership of the commission shall be expanded so that
64 each commissioner shall represent and serve a geographical
65 district that shall be identical to a corresponding
66 congressional district, as fixed and established by Section
67 17-14-70 or pursuant to any map ordered by a court to be used
68 in lieu thereof. Each commissioner must have been a resident
69 of the state for a period of seven years immediately before
70 taking office and reside in the state while in office. The
71 Secretary of State and Governor shall ensure that
72 commissioners are phased in so that each of the seven
73 congressional districts are represented by the terms beginning
74 in January 2031.
75 (2) No later than July 15, 2026, the Governor shall
76 appoint four commissioners to serve initial terms, two of whom
77 shall serve a two-year term and two of whom shall serve a
78 four-year term. When making appointments, the Governor shall
79 choose one individual from a list of three names submitted for
80 each position. The lists shall be jointly submitted by the
81 Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of
82 Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
83 The lists shall be provided to the Governor no later than June
84 1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
SB360 Engrossed
85 (3) The elections of commissioners shall be phased in
86 and staggered as follows:
87 a. At the general election held in November 2026, two
88 commissioners shall be elected.
89 b. At the general election held in November 2028, one
90 commissioner shall be elected to replace the commissioner
91 previously known as president of the commission and two
92 commissioners shall be elected to replace the two
93 commissioners who were appointed to serve a two-year term,
94 including one commissioner representing the Seventh
95 Congressional District.
96 c. At the general election held in November 2030, two
97 commissioners shall be elected to replace the two
98 commissioners who were appointed to serve a four-year term,
99 including one commissioner representing the Second
100 Congressional District.
101 (c) All commissioners who are elected after June 1,
102 2026, shall serve terms of six years that begin on the first
103 Monday after the second Tuesday in January following the
104 general election.
105 (c)(d) If any vacancy should occur occurs in any one of
106 the offices, caused by death, resignation, or otherwise, the
107 same office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor,
108 the appointee holding for the balance to serve for the
109 remainder of the unexpired term. If any person individual
110 elected to the office of public service commissioner shall
111 fail or refuse fails or refuses for 30 days to qualify, such
112 the failure or refusal shall be held to create deemed a
Page 4

the failure or refusal shall be held to create deemed a
SB360 Engrossed
113 vacancy in the office., which vacancy shall be filled by
114 appointment by the Governor, the appointee to hold for the
115 term for which the person so failing or refusing to qualify
116 was elected When making an appointment to fill a vacancy, the
117 Governor shall choose one individual from a list of three
118 names jointly submitted by the Lieutenant Governor, the
119 Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President Pro
120 Tempore of the Senate.
121 (e) At the beginning of each term, starting with the
122 term elected in November 2028, the commissioners shall elect a
123 president and vice-president from among the membership of
124 commissioners.
125 (d)(f) The provisions of this section shall not
126 diminish the current term of any member elected to the Public
127 Service Commission."
128 "§37-1-5
129 (a) No public service commissioner or clerk Public
130 service commissioners, the Secretary of Energy, the spouse and
131 children of any commissioner or the secretary, and employees
132 of the commission shall, during his continuance in office,
133 personally or through any partner or agent, may not render any
134 professional paid service for public utilities.
135 (b) A utility regulated by the Public Service
136 Commission may not make a contribution to any candidate
137 running for the office of a public service commissioner.
138 (c) The commissioners shall be subject to the ethics
139 laws under Chapter 25 of Title 36.
140 (d) No commissioner, for a fee, reward, or other
Page 5

(d) No commissioner, for a fee, reward, or other
SB360 Engrossed
141 compensation, in addition to that received in his or her
142 official capacity, shall represent any person before the
143 Legislature or any executive department or agency."
144 "§37-1-12
145 (a)(1) Beginning January 19, 2027, the position of
146 Secretary of Energy is created as a member of the Governor's
147 cabinet. The secretary shall be appointed by and serve at the
148 pleasure of the Governor. The secretary's salary shall be
149 fixed by the Governor and shall not be subject to Section
150 36-6-6. The secretary must have experience in utility
151 regulation or energy policy or a related field.
152 (2) The Secretary of Energy shall direct the activities
153 of the commission and shall set the agendas for all meetings
154 of the commissioners, provided a meeting agenda may be amended
155 by the affirmative vote of at least five commissioners.
156 (3) The Secretary of Energy shall have authority over
157 personnel and administrative functions of the commission.
158 (4) The Secretary of Energy shall be subject to the
159 ethics laws under Chapter 25 of Title 36.
160 (b) The commissionsecretary, under the provisions of
161 the merit systemMerit System, shall have the authority to
162 appoint or employ professional and administrative employees,
163 including attorneys, officers, and such accountants,
164 engineers, experts, inspectors, and other clerks and other
165 employees as are necessary or expedient to carry out the
166 duties conferred by law upon the commission., and the salaries
167 thereforThe salaries of all employees shall be fixed according
168 to the provisions of the merit systemMerit System. The
Page 6

to the provisions of the merit systemMerit System. The
SB360 Engrossed
169 commission secretary shall also, by and with the approval of
170 the Governor, have authority to employ and discharge special
171 counsel or attorneys as it may be deemed necessary for such
172 purpose.
173 (c) Any unclassified employee who is employed by the
174 commission on the effective date of this act and was appointed
175 by a commissioner shall continue to be employed without regard
176 to his or her appointing authority. The Secretary of Energy
177 shall, in consultation with the State Personnel Board, work to
178 transfer these unclassified employees into classified
179 service."
180 Section 3. Sections 37-1-81.1 and 31-1-81.2 are added
181 to the Code of Alabama 1975 to read as follows:
182 §37-1-81.1
183 (a) The retail base rates established and in place on
184 October 1, 2026 for each utility that is regulated by the
185 commission and that provides retail electric service may not
186 be increased before January 1, 2029.
187 (b) On and after January 1, 2029, a utility that
188 provides retail electric service may not factor the following
189 costs into the calculation or determination of a new rate or
190 service regulation or a change to an existing rate or service
191 regulation charged to customers of the utility:
192 (1) Costs incurred due to the utility providing funding
193 or grants that impact rates to other persons or organizations.
194 (2) Costs incurred due to the hiring of persons for the
195 purpose of lobbying the Legislature or any other political
196 office or subdivision of the state.
Page 7

office or subdivision of the state.
SB360 Engrossed
197 (3) Costs incurred due to advertisement of the utility
198 other than public safety advertising approved by the
199 commission.
200 (c)(1) When an electric utility files a new schedule to
201 put in operation a new rate or service regulation or to change
202 an existing rate or service regulation, the utility shall
203 affirm that the utility has not included the prohibited costs
204 under subsection (b) in the calculation or determination of
205 the rate or service regulation.
206 (2) If the electric utility fails to make the
207 affirmation, the rate or service regulation shall be void.
208 (d) If the commission discovers that a utility has
209 included the prohibited cost under subsection (b) in the
210 calculation or determination of rates or service regulations,
211 the commission shall investigate the determination pursuant to
212 Section 37-1-83 and other powers of investigation granted to
213 the commission pursuant to this division.
214 §37-1-81.2
215 The commissioners and staff of the commission shall
216 convene at least one public meeting per calendar year with
217 utility representatives to provide information to the public
218 on cost trends, reliability, resilience, general
219 infrastructure investment plans, economic development impacts,
220 security of the power grid, national trends in energy
221 production, and other regulatory issues the Secretary of
222 Energy deems relevant. The public meetings shall be conducted
223 in a manner that gives residents the opportunity to
224 participate, addresses concerns voiced by the public, and
Page 8

participate, addresses concerns voiced by the public, and
SB360 Engrossed
225 provides a review of key issues that the secretary believes
226 will be helpful to the public in understanding issues that
227 impact services under its jurisdiction.
228 Section 4. Sections 17-14-2, 17-14-3, and 36-3-1, Code
229 of Alabama 1975, are amended to make conforming changes to
230 read as follows:
231 "§17-14-2
232 General elections throughout the state shall be held
233 for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Auditor,
234 Secretary of State, Treasurer, Commissioner of Agriculture and
235 Industries, three public service commissioners, no two of whom
236 shall be elected from the same from each congressional
237 district, Chief Justice and associate justices of the Supreme
238 Court, judges of the courts of appeals, electors for President
239 and Vice President of the United States, United States
240 senators, and such other officers as may be required by law to
241 be elected by the voters of the entire state; for a member of
242 Congress in each congressional district; judges of the circuit
243 court in each judicial circuit; judges of the district courts
244 in each district; district attorneys in each judicial circuit;
245 a senator in each senatorial district; a representative in the
246 Legislature in each house district; a judge of the probate
247 court, sheriff, clerks of the circuit courts, tax assessor,
248 tax collector, a county treasurer in counties of more than
249 56,000 population, as provided by law, coroner, and members of
250 the county commission in each county, and constables in each
251 precinct of the county."
252 "§17-14-3
Page 9

"§17-14-3
SB360 Engrossed
253 The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General,
254 Auditor, Secretary of State, Treasurer, Commissioner of
255 Agriculture and Industries, senators and representatives in
256 the Legislature, a sheriff in each county, one coroner in all
257 counties having a coroner, and other officers not otherwise
258 provided for, shall be elected on the first Tuesday after the
259 first Monday in November 2006, and every fourth year
260 thereafter. A president of the Public Service Commission shall
261 be elected on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
262 November 2008, and every fourth year thereafter. Two associate
263 public service commissioners shall be elected on the first
264 Tuesday after the first Monday in November 2006, and every
265 fourth year thereafter."
266 "§36-3-1
267 The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General,
268 Auditor, Secretary of State, Treasurer, and Commissioner of
269 Agriculture and Industries, the President of the Public
270 Service Commission and two associate public service
271 commissioners shall hold their respective offices for the term
272 of four years from the time of their installation in office
273 and until their successors shall be elected and qualified,
274 such installation to take place on the first Monday after the
275 second Tuesday in January next after their election."
276 Section 5. Section 37-1-9, Code of Alabama 1975,
277 providing further for the public service commissioners, is
278 repealed.
279 Section 6. This act shall become effective on June 1,
280 2026.
Page 10

2026.
SB360 Engrossed
281
282
283 Senate
284 Read for the first time and referred ................10-Mar-26
285 to the Senate committee on Fiscal
286 Responsibility and Economic
287 Development
288
289 Read for the second time and placed ................11-Mar-26
290 on the calendar:
291 0 amendments
292
293 Read for the third time and passed ................12-Mar-26
294 as amended
295 Yeas 32
296 Nays 0
297 Abstains 0
298
299
300 Patrick Harris,
301 Secretary.
302
Page 11